District of Columbia statutes.
20-726

Exceptions to account; supervised administration.

Any interested person may file an exception to an account with the Register within 30 days of the filing of the account. Such person shall mail a copy of the exception to the personal representative.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(ss), 42 DCR 63

Section References

This section is referenced in § 20-736.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-726.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.